Arkansas, session 2025, HB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-4-309 is amended to read as follows:
10-4-309. Enforcement by prosecuting attorney.
(a)(1) In such cases when compliance has not been obtained by the
public servant within the above-given time periods, the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee shall notify and refer the matter to the respective
prosecuting attorney of each public servant and the prosecuting attorney
Attorney General, who shall conduct an investigation into the transactions
coming within the fiscal management laws contained in § 10-4-304 as to the
public servant's compliance with the laws as they related to the public
servant's functions within a state agency, institution, department, board,
commission, bureau, or within a county, municipality, or school district.
(2) The prosecuting attorney Attorney General shall report back
to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee within forty-five (45) days from
the date of the matter's being referred to him or her by the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee.
(3) If at the conclusion of his or her investigation under
subsection (a) of this section the Attorney General believes that one (1) or
*MBM034*
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
more criminal charges are warranted, he or she shall notify the prosecuting
attorney having criminal jurisdiction in the matter within five (5) days of
the conclusion of the investigation.
(b) The prosecuting attorney commits the offense of noncompliance if
after being duly advised of the given facts of a situation that relate to a
charge of noncompliance against another public servant he or she fails or
omits to perform the duty of conducting an investigation required of him or
her by this section.
(b)(1) For purposes of this section, the Attorney General has
concurrent jurisdiction with local law enforcement agencies to investigate
the transactions under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If requested by the Attorney General, a law enforcement
agency shall assist in the investigation of the transactions under subsection
(a) of this section.
(3)(A) Upon request, a public servant and all records of the
public servant shall be made available to the Attorney General for the
purpose of conducting an investigation under this section.
(B) Upon request, a financial record maintained by a bank
or a similar institution shall be made available to the Attorney General for
the purpose of conducting an investigation under this section.
(4)(A) A subpoena requiring the production of a document or the
attendance of a witness at an interview, trial, or hearing conducted under
the jurisdiction of the Attorney General under this section may be served by
the Attorney General or any authorized law enforcement officer in this state
personally, telephonically, or by registered or certified mail.
(B) In the case of service by registered or certified
mail, the return post office receipt of delivery of the subpoena shall
accompany the return.
(C)(i) If a person upon whom a subpoena is served objects
or otherwise fails to comply with the Attorney General's request for records,
the Attorney General may file an action in circuit court for an order to
enforce the request.
(ii) Venue for the action to enforce the request is
in Pulaski County.
(iii) Upon cause shown, the circuit court shall
order the person to tender the requested record to the Attorney General for
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
the purpose of conducting an investigation under this section.
(D)(i) A record obtained by the Attorney General under
this section shall be classified as confidential information, is exempt from
the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and is
not subject to outside review or release by any individual except when the
record is used or is potentially to be used by any governmental entity in any
legal, administrative, or judicial proceeding.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
a person is not subject to any civil or criminal liability for providing a
record or providing access to a record under this section to the Attorney
General or to a prosecuting attorney.
(c)(1) An attorney employed in the office of the Attorney General may
be designated by a prosecuting attorney having criminal jurisdiction in a
matter as a special deputy prosecutor for the purpose of prosecuting in a
court of competent jurisdiction an action brought in relation to an
investigation of a transaction under subsection (a) of this section.
(2)(A) As a special deputy prosecutor, an attorney designated
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section may issue a subpoena and administer
an oath as provided in § 25-16-705.
(B) The subpoena shall be substantially in the form set
forth in § 25-16-705(b).
(3) A special deputy prosecutor appointed and functioning as
authorized under this subsection is entitled to the same immunity granted by
law to the prosecuting attorney.
(4)(A) Appointment as a special deputy prosecutor does not
enable an attorney designated under subdivision (c)(1) of this section to
receive any additional fee or salary from the state for a service provided
under the appointment.
(B) Any expense of the special deputy prosecutor and any
fees and costs incurred by the special deputy prosecutor in the prosecution
of a case as provided in this section is the responsibility of the Attorney
General.
(5) The prosecuting attorney may revoke the appointment of a
special deputy prosecutor under this section at any time.
(d) If the Attorney General or an employee of his or her office is the
public servant at issue, the notice and referral under subsection (a) of this
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
section shall be made to the prosecuting attorney having criminal
jurisdiction in the matter, who shall perform the duties of the Attorney
General under this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 10-4-419 is amended to read as follows:
10-4-419. Report of improper or illegal practices.
(a)(1) If an audit report presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee or the appropriate standing subcommittee of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee reflects evidence of improper practices of financial
administration or inadequacy of fiscal records, the Legislative Auditor shall
report the evidence to the appropriate executive official or officials
affected thereby and to the governing body of the entity of the state or
political subdivision of the state.
(2) If the findings relate to an entity of the state, the
Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State and the Attorney General.
(3) If the findings relate to a prosecuting attorney's office,
the Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Attorney
General for review and appropriate action.
(b)(1) If an audit report presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee or the appropriate standing subcommittee of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee reflects evidence of apparent unauthorized disbursements
or unaccounted-for funds or property by a public official or employee, the
Legislative Auditor shall promptly report the transactions in writing to the
prosecuting attorney for the county in which the entity of the state or the
political subdivision of the state is located, the Governor, the Attorney
General, the appropriate executive official or officials affected thereby,
and the governing body of the entity of the state or political subdivision of
the state.
(2) If the findings relate to an entity of the state, the
Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State.
(3) [Repealed.]
(c)(1) The Attorney General shall conduct an investigation of a
transaction reported under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) If at the conclusion of his or her investigation under this
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
subsection the Attorney General believes that one (1) or more criminal
charges are warranted, he or she shall notify the prosecuting attorney having
criminal jurisdiction in the matter within five (5) days of the conclusion of
the investigation.
(d)(1) For purposes of this section, the Attorney General has
concurrent jurisdiction with local law enforcement agencies to investigate
the transactions reported under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) If requested by the Attorney General, a law enforcement
agency shall assist in the investigation of the transactions reported under
subsection (b) of this section.
(3)(A) Upon request, a public official or employee and all
records of the public official or employee shall be made available to the
Attorney General for the purpose of conducting an investigation under this
section.
(B) Upon request, a financial record maintained by a bank
or a similar institution shall be made available to the Attorney General for
the purpose of conducting an investigation under this section.
(4)(A) A subpoena requiring the production of a document or the
attendance of a witness at an interview, trial, or hearing conducted under
the jurisdiction of the Attorney General under this section may be served by
the Attorney General or any authorized law enforcement officer in this state
personally, telephonically, or by registered or certified mail.
(B) In the case of service by registered or certified
mail, the return post office receipt of delivery of the subpoena shall
accompany the return.
(C)(i) If a person upon whom a subpoena is served objects
or otherwise fails to comply with the Attorney General's request for records,
the Attorney General may file an action in circuit court for an order to
enforce the request.
(ii) Venue for the action to enforce the request is
in Pulaski County.
(iii) Upon cause shown, the circuit court shall
order the entity or person to tender the requested record to the Attorney
General for the purpose of conducting an investigation under this section.
(D)(i) A record obtained by the Attorney General under
this section shall be classified as confidential information, is exempt from
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and is
not subject to outside review or release by any individual except when the
record is used or is potentially to be used by any governmental entity in any
legal, administrative, or judicial proceeding.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
a person is not subject to any civil or criminal liability for providing a
record or providing access to a record under this section to the Attorney
General or to a prosecuting attorney.
(e)(1) An attorney employed in the office of the Attorney General may
be designated by a prosecuting attorney having criminal jurisdiction in a
matter as a special deputy prosecutor for the purpose of prosecuting in a
court of competent jurisdiction an action brought in relation to an
investigation of a transaction reported under subsection (b) of this section.
(2)(A) As a special deputy prosecutor, an attorney designated
under subdivision (e)(1) of this section may issue a subpoena and administer
an oath as provided in § 25-16-705.
(B) The subpoena shall be substantially in the form set
forth in § 25-16-705(b).
(3) A special deputy prosecutor appointed and functioning as
authorized under this subsection is entitled to the same immunity granted by
law to the prosecuting attorney.
(4)(A) Appointment as a special deputy prosecutor does not
enable an attorney designated under subdivision (e)(1) of this section to
receive any additional fee or salary from the state for a service provided
pursuant to the appointment.
(B) Any expense of the special deputy prosecutor and any
fees and costs incurred by the special deputy prosecutor in the prosecution
of a case as provided in this section is the responsibility of the Attorney
General.
(5) The prosecuting attorney may revoke the appointment of a
special deputy prosecutor under this section at any time.
(c)(1)(f)(1) The Legislative Auditor shall notify and cooperate with
the appropriate prosecuting attorney and the Attorney General on all matters
that appear to involve a criminal offense.
(2) Upon request and with the approval of the cochairs of the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Legislative Auditor shall cooperate
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
in any other investigations by the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the
Attorney General, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or any other state
or federal law enforcement agency.
(d)(1)(g)(1) While the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not
established as an agency to effect through its own direct action the
correction of improper practices of financial administration or the
inadequacy of fiscal records, the prosecution of defaulting public officials,
or the improvement of accounting systems in any entity of the state or
political subdivision of the state, it is nevertheless determined that the
action or nonaction on the part of the appropriate public officials in
respect to the correction of the matters when called to their attention or in
respect to the institution of criminal proceedings where proper, has
pertinent bearing upon the question of the necessity for future remedial
legislation.
(2) It is for this reason that the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee is authorized to inform public officials to the extent provided by
law of the findings of the Legislative Auditor in respect to any such
matters.
(e)(1)(h) If the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee determines that
an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state has not
corrected the deficiencies noted in one (1) or more previous reports, the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may request the prosecuting attorney of
the judicial district in which the entity of the state or the political
subdivision of the state is located Attorney General to take appropriate
action to assure that the records of the entity of the state or the political
subdivision of the state are maintained in accordance with law.
(2) If the prosecuting attorney fails or refuses to take
appropriate action within a reasonable time after receipt of notice from the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee that an entity of the state or a
political subdivision of the state is not maintaining its records in
substantial compliance with law, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may
request the Attorney General to take such appropriate action as may be
necessary to assure that the records of the entity of the state or political
subdivision of the state are maintained in compliance with law.
(f)(1)(i)(1) By June 30 of each year, the Attorney General and each
prosecuting attorney to whom the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or the
12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034

HB1122
Legislative Auditor has reported a matter under this section shall file with
the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee a disposition report on the status
of the matters that have not been previously reported as resolved to the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
(2) A disposition report shall address all matters that have not
been previously reported as resolved under subdivision (f)(1)(i)(1) of this
section prior to and during the preceding calendar year.
(3) A disposition report shall include without limitation:
(A) The date the matter was reported to the Attorney
General or the prosecuting attorney;
(B) The amount of loss or funds unaccounted for in
connection with the matter;
(C) The status or disposition of the matter; and
(D) Other comments pertinent to the investigation or
disposition of the matter.
(j) If the Attorney General or an employee of his or her office is the
public official or employee at issue, the report under subsection (b) of this
section shall be made to the prosecuting attorney having criminal
jurisdiction in the matter, who shall perform the duties of the Attorney
General under this section.
















12/30/2024 8:48:54 AM MBM034